Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3601
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that pretrial diversion offers persons charged with criminal offenses and minor traffic violations an alternative to traditional criminal justice proceedings in that: (1) It permits participation by the accused only on a voluntary basis; (2) the accused has access to counsel for criminal offenses prior to a decision to participate; (3) it occurs prior to an adjudication but after arrest and a decision has been made by the prosecutor that the offense will support criminal charges; and (4) it results in dismissal of charges, or its equivalent, if the individual successfully completes the diversion process.

Laws 1979, LB 573, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 11.